Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 6. Enforcement; Penalties.

Sec. 43.23.260.
Subpoena power.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee at the director level may issue subpoenas to compel the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records considered necessary as evidence in connection with an investigation under or the administration of this chapter.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person under (a) of this section, the superior court may, upon application by the department, issue an order requiring the person to appear before the department to produce evidence if ordered. Failure to obey the order of the court is punishable as contempt.

A person who, without just cause, fails or refuses to produce books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records, if it is in the person’s power to do so, in obedience to a subpoena of the department or an authorized representative of it, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by both. Each day the failure or refusal continues is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 97 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.033

; renumbered in 2018.

Sec. 43.23.270.
Penalties and enforcement.

In addition to any criminal penalties imposed by state law, if an individual is convicted of a crime in connection with a false statement made in a certification required under AS

43.23.015

, and the conviction is not reversed, that individual forfeits all permanent fund dividends paid and is not eligible for a future permanent fund dividend.

If the commissioner determines that a permanent fund dividend should not have been claimed by or paid to an individual, the commissioner may use all collection procedures or remedies available for collection of taxes under this title to recover the payment of a permanent fund dividend that was improperly made. A notice of an improperly paid dividend must be sent to the individual within

three years after the improper payment is sent; or

six years after the improper payment is sent if the commissioner determines that the individual exercised gross negligence or recklessly disregarded a material fact in connection with a false statement made in an application.

In addition to any criminal penalties imposed by state law, if the department finds that an individual, in claiming a permanent fund dividend, or an individual, in certifying another person’s eligibility, wilfully misrepresents, exercises gross negligence with respect to, or recklessly disregards a material fact pertaining to, eligibility, the department may issue an order against the individual for the

forfeiture of the dividend;

imposition of a civil fine of up to $3,000; and

loss of eligibility to receive the next five dividends following the forfeited dividend.

If notice is not sent within the time required under (b) of this section, administrative or judicial proceedings may not be commenced for recovery of an improperly paid dividend. The time limitations of (b) of this section do not apply if a dividend is forfeited under (a) of this section or if it is more probable than not that an individual has committed a crime in connection with a false statement made in an application.

The provisions of AS

43.23.015(g)

and (i) apply to a request for review of, and to appeal of, a decision under (c) of this section by an individual aggrieved by the decision. When all appeals have been exhausted under this chapter or the time when all of the appeals that could have been taken has expired, the order issued imposing a civil fine, forfeiture, or loss of eligibility becomes final and enforceable in the same manner as a judgment of the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 159 SLA 1988; am §§ 12, 13 ch 4 SLA 1992; am §§ 23, 24 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.035

; renumbered in 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 34(b), ch. 42, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of (c) of this section and (e) of this section “apply only with respect to applications filed on or after July 1, 2006,” and that subsection (c) “as it read before July 1, 2006, applies with respect to applications filed before July 1, 2006.”